North Dakota, session 69, HB1135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 37-14-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-14-04. Veterans' aid fund - Purpose.
The purpose of the veterans' aid fund is to make loans to any veteran and to a surviving spouse of
a veteran. A qualified applicant may be permitted to receive more than one loan providing the total
amount of all loans does not exceed fiveeight thousand dollars.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 37-14-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-14-06. Department may provide aid.
If the department of veterans' affairs is satisfied that an applicant is a veteran or the surviving
spouse of a veteran and has not remarried, and that the applicant is a citizen and resident of this state,
and that the applicant meets the criteria set forth in rules adopted pursuant to section 37-14-10
regarding qualifications to obtain a loan, the department may loan to the applicant a sum from the
veterans' aid fund not to exceed fiveeight thousand dollars. Additional loans may be made to an
applicant if the applicant still meets the loan criteria and if the total of all loans does not exceed fiveeight
thousand dollars. If an applicant is provided more than one loan, the amounts will be consolidated into
one payment.

H. B. NO. 1135 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1135.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State